Missouri, session 2026, HB2655.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.020, 301.140, 301.190, 307.350, and 307.380, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.020,
301.140, 301.190, 307.350, and 307.380, to read as follows:
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer, which shall be operated or
driven upon the highways of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, shall
annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank to be furnished by the director of revenue for that purpose containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or trailer to be registered, including the
name of the manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount of motive power of
the motor vehicle, stated in figures of horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be
registered as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number and address of the owner of such
motor vehicle or trailer;
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired load in pounds if the vehicle is a
commercial motor vehicle or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section
301.010 and if such vehicle is [ten years of age or less] model year 2012 or newer and has
less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2655 2
retain the odometer information provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for
prompt access to such information, together with the vehicle identification number for the
motor vehicle to which such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of
such information. This section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle primarily for business
use, a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or any
commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve thousand pounds and if such motor
vehicle is [ten years of age or less] model year 2012 or newer and has less than one hundred
fifty thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer
information provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access to such
information, together with the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which
such information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This
subsection shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle,
specially constructed motor vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573, the owner or lienholder shall
surrender the certificate of ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and obtain the vehicle examination
certificate required pursuant to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner retains the
vehicle, as prior salvage, the vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination
requirements under subsection 10 of section 301.190. Notarized bills of sale along with a
copy of the front and back of the certificate of ownership for all major component parts
installed on the vehicle and invoices for all essential parts which are not defined as major
component parts shall accompany the application for a new certificate of ownership. If the
vehicle is a specially constructed motor vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures of
the vehicle shall be submitted with the application. If the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the
applicant shall submit the invoice and the manufacturer's statement of origin on the kit. If the
vehicle requires the issuance of a special number by the director of revenue or a replacement
vehicle identification number, the applicant shall submit the required application and
application fee. All applications required under this subsection shall be submitted with any

HB 2655 3
applicable taxes which may be due on the purchase of the vehicle or parts. The director of
revenue shall appropriately designate "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the
current and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership of such vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for repair of a motor vehicle which as
the result of such repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010
or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner is
retaining the vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle, and in a first party claim,
the lienholder if a lien is in effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of ownership,
and the documents and fees required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior
salvage motor vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as otherwise required
by law to obtain a salvage certificate of ownership, from the director of revenue. The
insurance company shall within thirty days of the payment of such claims report to the
director of revenue the name and address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
identification number, and license plate number of the vehicle, and the date of loss and
payment.
6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
7. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
8. An applicant for registration may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund as established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor fund shall be
used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at

HB 2655 4
the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
is interested in making a contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in this subsection.
9. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri medal of honor
recipients fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of honor recipients
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 226.925, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
100 the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
101 is interested in making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
301.140. 1. Upon the transfer of ownership of any motor vehicle or trailer, the
certificate of registration and the right to use the number plates shall expire and the number
plates shall be removed by the owner at the time of the transfer of possession, and it shall be
unlawful for any person other than the person to whom such number plates were originally
issued to have the same in his or her possession whether in use or not, unless such possession
is solely for charitable purposes; except that the buyer of a motor vehicle or trailer who trades
in a motor vehicle or trailer may attach the license plates from the traded-in motor vehicle or
trailer to the newly purchased motor vehicle or trailer. The operation of a motor vehicle with
such transferred plates shall be lawful for no more than thirty days, or no more than ninety
days if the dealer is selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of section 301.213, or no
more than sixty days if the dealer is selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of
subsection 5 of section 301.210. As used in this subsection, the term "trade-in motor vehicle
or trailer" shall include any single motor vehicle or trailer sold by the buyer of the newly
purchased vehicle or trailer, as long as the license plates for the trade-in motor vehicle or
trailer are still valid.
2. In the case of a transfer of ownership the original owner may register another
motor vehicle under the same number, upon the payment of a fee of two dollars, if the motor
vehicle is of horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a passenger-carrying commercial
motor vehicle) seating capacity, not in excess of that originally registered. When such motor
vehicle is of greater horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a passenger-carrying
commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a greater fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall pay a transfer fee of two dollars and a pro rata portion for the difference in
fees. When such vehicle is of less horsepower, gross weight or (in case of a passenger-
carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a lesser fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall not be entitled to a refund.

HB 2655 5
3. License plates may be transferred from a motor vehicle which will no longer be
operated to a newly purchased motor vehicle by the owner of such vehicles. The owner shall
pay a transfer fee of two dollars if the newly purchased vehicle is of horsepower, gross weight
or (in the case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, not in
excess of that of the vehicle which will no longer be operated. When the newly purchased
motor vehicle is of greater horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a passenger-carrying
commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a greater fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall pay a transfer fee of two dollars and a pro rata portion of the difference in fees.
When the newly purchased vehicle is of less horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a
passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a lesser fee is
prescribed, the applicant shall not be entitled to a refund.
4. (1) The director of the department of revenue shall have authority to produce or
allow others to produce a weather resistant, nontearing temporary permit authorizing the
operation of a motor vehicle or trailer by a buyer for not more than thirty days, or no more
than sixty days if issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of
subsection 5 of section 301.210, from the date of purchase. The temporary permit authorized
under this section may be purchased by the purchaser of a motor vehicle or trailer from the
central office of the department of revenue or from an authorized agent of the department of
revenue upon satisfaction of all applicable taxes under chapter 144, upon proof of purchase of
a motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer has no registration plate available for transfer
and upon proof of financial responsibility, or from a motor vehicle dealer upon purchase of a
motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer has no registration plate available for transfer, or
from a motor vehicle dealer upon purchase of a motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer
has registered and is awaiting receipt of registration plates. The director of the department of
revenue or a producer authorized by the director of the department of revenue may make
temporary permits available to registered dealers in this state, authorized agents of the
department of revenue or the department of revenue. The price paid by a motor vehicle
dealer, an authorized agent of the department of revenue or the department of revenue for a
temporary permit shall not exceed five dollars for each permit. The director of the
department of revenue shall direct motor vehicle dealers and authorized agents to obtain
temporary permits from an authorized producer. Amounts received by the director of the
department of revenue for temporary permits shall constitute state revenue; however, amounts
received by an authorized producer other than the director of the department of revenue shall
not constitute state revenue and any amounts received by motor vehicle dealers or authorized
agents for temporary permits purchased from a producer other than the director of the
department of revenue shall not constitute state revenue. In no event shall revenues from the
general revenue fund or any other state fund be utilized to compensate motor vehicle dealers

HB 2655 6
or other producers for their role in producing temporary permits as authorized under this
section. Amounts that do not constitute state revenue under this section shall also not
constitute fees for registration or certificates of title to be collected by the director of the
department of revenue under section 301.190. No motor vehicle dealer, authorized agent or
the department of revenue shall charge more than five dollars for each permit issued. The
permit shall be valid for a period of thirty days, or no more than ninety days if issued by a
dealer selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of section 301.213, or no more than sixty
days if issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of subsection 5 of
section 301.210, from the date of purchase of a motor vehicle or trailer, or from the date of
sale of the motor vehicle or trailer by a motor vehicle dealer for which the purchaser obtains a
permit as set out above. No permit shall be issued for a vehicle under this section unless the
buyer shows proof of financial responsibility. Each temporary permit issued shall be securely
fastened to the back or rear of the motor vehicle in a manner and place on the motor vehicle
consistent with registration plates so that all parts and qualities of the temporary permit
thereof shall be plainly and clearly visible, reasonably clean and are not impaired in any way.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection requiring satisfaction of all
applicable taxes under chapter 144 shall become effective only upon notification by the
director of the department of revenue that implementation of such requirements are
technologically feasible following the development and maintenance of a modernized,
integrated system for the titling of vehicles, the issuance and renewal of vehicle registrations,
the issuance and renewal of drivers' licenses and identification cards, and the perfection and
release of liens and encumbrances on vehicles.
5. The permit shall be issued on a form prescribed by the director of the department of
revenue and issued only for the applicant's temporary operation of the motor vehicle or trailer
purchased to enable the applicant to temporarily operate the motor vehicle while proper title
and registration plates are being obtained, or while awaiting receipt of registration plates, and
shall be displayed on no other motor vehicle. Temporary permits issued pursuant to this
section shall not be transferable or renewable, shall not be valid upon issuance of proper
registration plates for the motor vehicle or trailer, and shall be returned to the department or to
the department's agent upon the issuance of such proper registration plates. Any temporary
permit returned to the department or to the department's agent shall be immediately
destroyed. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to temporary permits issued for
commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight.
The director of the department of revenue shall determine the size, material, design,
numbering configuration, construction, and color of the permit. The director of the
department of revenue, at his or her discretion, shall have the authority to reissue, and thereby

HB 2655 7
extend the use of, a temporary permit previously and legally issued for a motor vehicle or
100 trailer while proper title and registration are being obtained.
101 6. Every motor vehicle dealer that issues temporary permits shall keep, for inspection
102 by proper officers, an accurate record of each permit issued by recording the permit number,
103 the motor vehicle dealer's number, buyer's name and address, the motor vehicle's year, make,
104 and manufacturer's vehicle identification number, and the permit's date of issuance and
105 expiration date. Upon the issuance of a temporary permit by either the central office of the
106 department of revenue, a motor vehicle dealer or an authorized agent of the department of
107 revenue, the director of the department of revenue shall make the information associated with
108 the issued temporary permit immediately available to the law enforcement community of the
109 state of Missouri.
110 7. Upon the transfer of ownership of any currently registered motor vehicle wherein
111 the owner cannot transfer the license plates due to a change of motor vehicle category, the
112 owner may surrender the license plates issued to the motor vehicle and receive credit for any
113 unused portion of the original registration fee against the registration fee of another motor
114 vehicle. Such credit shall be granted based upon the date the license plates are surrendered.
115 No refunds shall be made on the unused portion of any license plates surrendered for such
116 credit.
117 8. An additional temporary license plate produced in a manner and of materials
118 determined by the director to be the most cost-effective means of production with a
119 configuration that matches an existing or newly issued plate may be purchased by a motor
120 vehicle owner to be placed in the interior of the vehicle's rear window such that the driver's
121 view out of the rear window is not obstructed and the plate configuration is clearly visible
122 from the outside of the vehicle to serve as the visible plate when a bicycle rack or other item
123 obstructs the view of the actual plate. Such temporary plate is only authorized for use when
124 the matching actual plate is affixed to the vehicle in the manner prescribed in subsection 5 of
125 section 301.130. The fee charged for the temporary plate shall be equal to the fee charged for
126 a temporary permit issued under subsection 4 of this section. Replacement temporary plates
127 authorized in this subsection may be issued as needed upon the payment of a fee equal to the
128 fee charged for a temporary permit under subsection 4 of this section. The newly produced
129 third plate may only be used on the vehicle with the matching plate, and the additional plate
130 shall be clearly recognizable as a third plate and only used for the purpose specified in this
131 subsection.
132 9. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.217, the director may issue a
133 temporary permit to an individual who possesses a salvage motor vehicle which requires an
134 inspection under subsection 9 of section 301.190. The operation of a salvage motor vehicle
135 for which the permit has been issued shall be limited to the most direct route from the

HB 2655 8
136 residence, maintenance, or storage facility of the individual in possession of such motor
137 vehicle to the nearest authorized inspection facility and return to the originating location.
138 Notwithstanding any other requirements for the issuance of a temporary permit under this
139 section, an individual obtaining a temporary permit for the purpose of operating a motor
140 vehicle to and from an examination facility as prescribed in this subsection shall also
141 purchase the required motor vehicle examination form which is required to be completed for
142 an examination under subsection 9 of section 301.190 and provide satisfactory evidence that
143 such vehicle has passed a motor vehicle safety inspection for such vehicle as required in
144 section 307.350.
145 10. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person may be
146 stopped or inspected by law enforcement, based on reasonable suspicion that a
147 temporary permit violation has occurred, in order to determine whether a temporary
148 permit is current or valid. Upon a determination by law enforcement that a temporary
149 permit is expired by at least seventy days, or that a temporary permit has been altered,
150 the law enforcement officer conducting the stop shall issue a citation and such person
151 shall be fined in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars. If the person properly
152 registers the vehicle within thirty days of the issuance of a citation, the prosecutor shall
153 nolle prosequi the citation, court costs shall be waived, and the offense shall not be
154 registered as a violation on the person's driving record. If the vehicle is stopped a
155 second time for a temporary permit violation after such thirty-day time period has
156 lapsed, the vehicle shall be impounded until such time as the vehicle is properly
157 registered. It shall be the responsibility of the owner of the vehicle to work with the
158 impound lot owner if there is an issue with the vehicle's safety inspection.
159 11. The director of the department of revenue may promulgate all necessary rules and
160 regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
161 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
162 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
163 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
164 of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
165 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
166 the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2012,
167 shall be invalid and void.
168 [11.] 12. The repeal and reenactment of this section shall become effective on the date
169 the department of revenue or a producer authorized by the director of the department of
170 revenue begins producing temporary permits described in subsection 4 of such section, or on
171 July 1, 2013, whichever occurs first. If the director of revenue or a producer authorized by

HB 2655 9
172 the director of the department of revenue begins producing temporary permits prior to July 1,
173 2013, the director of the department of revenue shall notify the revisor of statutes of such fact.
301.190. 1. No certificate of registration of any motor vehicle or trailer, or number
plate therefor, shall be issued by the director of revenue unless the applicant therefor shall
make application for and be granted a certificate of ownership of such motor vehicle or trailer,
or shall present satisfactory evidence that such certificate has been previously issued to the
applicant for such motor vehicle or trailer. Application shall be made within thirty days after
the applicant acquires the motor vehicle or trailer, unless the motor vehicle was acquired
under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section 301.210 in which case the applicant shall
make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, upon a blank form
furnished by the director of revenue and shall contain the applicant's identification number, a
full description of the motor vehicle or trailer, the vehicle identification number, and the
mileage registered on the odometer at the time of transfer of ownership, as required by section
407.536, together with a statement of the applicant's source of title and of any liens or
encumbrances on the motor vehicle or trailer, provided that for good cause shown the director
of revenue may extend the period of time for making such application. When an owner wants
to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of ownership of a motor
vehicle or trailer that would cause it to be inconsistent with the name or names listed on the
notice of lien, the owner shall provide the director with documentation evidencing the
lienholder's authorization to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of
ownership.
2. The director of revenue shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the
facts stated in such application are true and shall, to the extent possible without substantially
delaying processing of the application, review any odometer information pertaining to such
motor vehicle that is accessible to the director of revenue. If satisfied that the applicant is the
lawful owner of such motor vehicle or trailer, or otherwise entitled to have the same
registered in his name, the director shall thereupon issue an appropriate certificate over his
signature and sealed with the seal of his office, procured and used for such purpose. The
certificate shall contain on its face a complete description, vehicle identification number, and
other evidence of identification of the motor vehicle or trailer, as the director of revenue may
deem necessary, together with the odometer information required to be put on the face of the
certificate pursuant to section 407.536, a statement of any liens or encumbrances which the
application may show to be thereon, and, if ownership of the vehicle has been transferred, the
name of the state issuing the transferor's title and whether the transferor's odometer mileage
statement executed pursuant to section 407.536 indicated that the true mileage is materially
different from the number of miles shown on the odometer, or is unknown.

HB 2655 10
3. The director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current and all
subsequent issues of the certificate the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle", or "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", as
defined in section 301.010. Effective July 1, 1990, on all original and all subsequent issues of
the certificate for motor vehicles as referenced in subsections 2 and 3 of section 301.020, the
director shall print on the face thereof the following designation: "Annual odometer updates
may be available from the department of revenue.". On any duplicate certificate, the director
of revenue shall reprint on the face thereof the most recent of either:
(1) The mileage information included on the face of the immediately prior certificate
and the date of purchase or issuance of the immediately prior certificate; or
(2) Any other mileage information provided to the director of revenue, and the date
the director obtained or recorded that information.
4. The certificate of ownership issued by the director of revenue shall be
manufactured in a manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to alter, counterfeit,
duplicate, or forge such certificate without ready detection. In order to carry out the
requirements of this subsection, the director of revenue may contract with a nonprofit
scientific or educational institution specializing in the analysis of secure documents to
determine the most effective methods of rendering Missouri certificates of ownership
nonalterable or noncounterfeitable.
5. The fee for each original certificate so issued shall be eight dollars and fifty cents,
in addition to the fee for registration of such motor vehicle or trailer. If application for the
certificate is not made within thirty days after the vehicle is acquired by the applicant, or
where the motor vehicle was acquired under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section
301.210 and the applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title
from the dealer, a delinquency penalty fee of twenty-five dollars for the first thirty days of
delinquency and twenty-five dollars for each thirty days of delinquency thereafter, not to
exceed a total of two hundred dollars, but such penalty may be waived by the director for a
good cause shown. If the director of revenue learns that any person has failed to obtain a
certificate within thirty days after acquiring a motor vehicle or trailer, or where the motor
vehicle was acquired under section 301.213 or subsection 5 of section 301.210 and the
applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, or
has sold a vehicle without obtaining a certificate, he shall cancel the registration of all
vehicles registered in the name of the person, either as sole owner or as a co-owner, and shall
notify the person that the cancellation will remain in force until the person pays the
delinquency penalty fee provided in this section, together with all fees, charges and payments
which the person should have paid in connection with the certificate of ownership and
registration of the vehicle. The certificate shall be good for the life of the motor vehicle or

HB 2655 11
trailer so long as the same is owned or held by the original holder of the certificate and shall
not have to be renewed annually.
6. Any applicant for a certificate of ownership requesting the department of revenue
to process an application for a certificate of ownership in an expeditious manner requiring
special handling shall pay a fee of five dollars in addition to the regular certificate of
ownership fee.
7. It is unlawful for any person to operate in this state a motor vehicle or trailer
required to be registered under the provisions of the law unless a certificate of ownership has
been applied for as provided in this section.
8. Before an original Missouri certificate of ownership is issued, an inspection of the
vehicle and a verification of vehicle identification numbers shall be made by the Missouri
state highway patrol on vehicles for which there is a current title issued by another state if a
Missouri salvage certificate of title has been issued for the same vehicle but no prior
inspection and verification has been made in this state, except that if such vehicle has been
inspected in another state by a law enforcement officer in a manner comparable to the
inspection process in this state and the vehicle identification numbers have been so verified,
the applicant shall not be liable for the twenty-five dollar inspection fee if such applicant
submits proof of inspection and vehicle identification number verification to the director of
revenue at the time of the application. The applicant, who has such a title for a vehicle on
which no prior inspection and verification have been made, shall pay a fee of twenty-five
dollars for such verification and inspection, payable to the director of revenue at the time of
the request for the application, which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of
the state highways and transportation department fund.
9. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, kit
vehicle, motor change vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, or other vehicle as required by
the director of revenue shall be accompanied by a vehicle examination certificate issued by
the Missouri state highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the
100 director of revenue. The vehicle examination shall include a verification of vehicle
101 identification numbers and a determination of the classification of the vehicle. The owner of
102 a vehicle which requires a vehicle examination certificate shall present the vehicle for
103 examination and obtain a completed vehicle examination certificate prior to submitting an
104 application for a certificate of ownership to the director of revenue. Notwithstanding any
105 provision of the law to the contrary, an owner presenting a motor vehicle which has been
106 issued a salvage title and which is ten years of age or older to a vehicle examination described
107 in this subsection in order to obtain a certificate of ownership with the designation prior
108 salvage motor vehicle shall not be required to repair or restore the vehicle to its original

HB 2655 12
109 appearance in order to pass or complete the vehicle examination. The fee for the vehicle
110 examination application shall be twenty-five dollars and shall be collected by the director of
111 revenue at the time of the request for the application and shall be deposited in the state
112 treasury to the credit of the state highways and transportation department fund. If the vehicle
113 is also to be registered in Missouri, the safety inspection required in chapter 307 and the
114 emissions inspection required under chapter 643 shall be completed and the fees required by
115 section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be charged to the owner.
116 10. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
117 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri or as required by
118 section 301.020, it shall be accompanied by a current inspection form certified by a duly
119 authorized official inspection station as described in chapter 307, except that such
120 inspection may be completed by an employee of a licensed new or used motor vehicle
121 dealer for a motor vehicle sold to a person who lives outside of this state and intends to
122 register the vehicle outside of this state or for a motor vehicle having less than thirty
123 thousand miles for the three-year period following the model year of manufacture. The
124 completed form shall certify that the manufacturer's identification number for the vehicle has
125 been inspected, that it is correctly displayed on the vehicle and shall certify the reading shown
126 on the odometer at the time of inspection. The inspection station or, in the case of a motor
127 vehicle sold to a person who lives outside of this state and intends to register the vehicle
128 outside of this state or a motor vehicle having less than thirty thousand miles for the
129 three-year period following the model year of manufacture, the licensed new or used
130 motor vehicle dealer shall collect the same fee as authorized in section 307.365 for making
131 the inspection, and the fee shall be deposited in the same manner as provided in section
132 307.365. If the vehicle is also to be registered in Missouri, the safety inspection required in
133 chapter 307 and the emissions inspection required under chapter 643 shall be completed and
134 only the fees required by section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be charged to the owner.
135 This section shall not apply to vehicles being transferred on a manufacturer's statement of
136 origin. A licensed new or used motor vehicle dealer completing the inspection under this
137 section shall be subject to disciplinary action up to and including suspension or
138 revocation of their dealer's license for knowingly completing such inspection with
139 incorrect information. Such disciplinary action shall take place in accordance with
140 department of revenue regular procedures for disciplinary action.
141 11. Motor vehicles brought into this state in a wrecked or damaged condition or after
142 being towed as an abandoned vehicle pursuant to another state's abandoned motor vehicle
143 procedures shall, in lieu of the inspection required by subsection 10 of this section, be
144 inspected by the Missouri state highway patrol in accordance with subsection 9 of this
145 section. If the inspection reveals the vehicle to be in a salvage or junk condition, the director

HB 2655 13
146 shall so indicate on any Missouri certificate of ownership issued for such vehicle. Any
147 salvage designation shall be carried forward on all subsequently issued certificates of title for
148 the motor vehicle.
149 12. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
150 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
151 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as a
152 reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, or
153 prior salvage vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
154 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the name of the issuing state
155 and such prior designation. The absence of any prior designation shall not relieve a transferor
156 of the duty to exercise due diligence with regard to such certificate of ownership prior to the
157 transfer of a certificate. If a transferor exercises any due diligence with regard to a certificate
158 of ownership, the legal transfer of a certificate of ownership without any designation that is
159 subsequently discovered to have or should have had a designation shall be a transfer free and
160 clear of any liabilities of the transferor associated with the missing designation.
161 13. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
162 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
163 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as non-USA-
164 std motor vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
165 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the words "Non-USA-Std
166 Motor Vehicle".
167 14. The director of revenue and the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
168 patrol shall make and enforce rules for the administration of the inspections required by this
169 section.
170 15. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
171 which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, manufactured forty or more years prior
172 to the current model year, and which has a value of three thousand dollars or less shall be
173 accompanied by:
174 (1) A proper affidavit submitted by the owner explaining how the motor vehicle or
175 trailer was acquired and, if applicable, the reasons a valid certificate of ownership cannot be
176 furnished;
177 (2) Photocopies of receipts, bills of sale establishing ownership, or titles, and the
178 source of all major component parts used to rebuild the vehicle;
179 (3) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars in addition to the fees described in subsection 5
180 of this section. Such fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state
181 highways and transportation department fund; and

HB 2655 14
182 (4) An inspection certificate, other than a motor vehicle examination certificate
183 required under subsection 9 of this section, completed and issued by the Missouri state
184 highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the director of revenue.
185 The inspection performed by the highway patrol or other authorized local law enforcement
186 agency shall include a check for stolen vehicles.
187
188 The department of revenue shall issue the owner a certificate of ownership designated with
189 the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle" and deliver such certificate of ownership in
190 accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of this section,
191 no owner of a reconstructed motor vehicle described in this subsection shall be required to
192 obtain a vehicle examination certificate issued by the Missouri state highway patrol.
307.350. 1. The owner of every motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010 which is
required to be registered in this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles having less than one hundred fifty thousand miles[, for the ten-
year period following their model year of manufacture] and of model year 2012 or newer,
excluding prior salvage vehicles immediately following a rebuilding process and vehicles
subject to the provisions of section 307.380;
(2) Those motor vehicles which are engaged in interstate commerce and are
proportionately registered in this state with the Missouri highway reciprocity commission,
although the owner may request that such vehicle be inspected by an official inspection
station, and a peace officer may stop and inspect such vehicles to determine whether the
mechanical condition is in compliance with the safety regulations established by the United
States Department of Transportation; and
(3) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 301.131;
(4) Vehicles registered in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds for a period of less
than twelve months;

shall submit such vehicles to a biennial inspection of their mechanism and equipment in
accordance with the provisions of sections 307.350 to 307.390 and obtain a certificate of
inspection and approval and a sticker, seal, or other device from a duly authorized official
inspection station. The inspection, except the inspection of school buses which shall be made
at the time provided in section 307.375, shall be made at the time prescribed in the rules and
regulations issued by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol; but the
inspection of a vehicle shall not be made more than sixty days prior to the date of application
for registration or within sixty days of when a vehicle's registration is transferred; however, if
a vehicle was purchased from a motor vehicle dealer and a valid inspection had been made
within sixty days of the purchase date, the new owner shall be able to utilize an inspection

HB 2655 15
performed within ninety days prior to the application for registration or transfer. Any vehicle
manufactured as an even-numbered model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved
pursuant to the safety inspection program established pursuant to sections 307.350 to 307.390
in each even-numbered calendar year and any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered
model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved pursuant to sections 307.350 to 307.390
in each odd-numbered year. The certificate of inspection and approval shall be a sticker, seal,
or other device or combination thereof, as the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol prescribes by regulation and shall be displayed upon the motor vehicle or trailer as
prescribed by the regulations established by him. The replacement of certificates of
inspection and approval which are lost or destroyed shall be made by the superintendent of
the Missouri state highway patrol under regulations prescribed by him.
2. For the purpose of obtaining an inspection only, it shall be lawful to operate a
vehicle over the most direct route between the owner's usual place of residence and an
inspection station of such owner's choice, notwithstanding the fact that the vehicle does not
have a current state registration license. It shall also be lawful to operate such a vehicle from
an inspection station to another place where repairs may be made and to return the vehicle to
the inspection station notwithstanding the absence of a current state registration license.
3. No person whose motor vehicle was duly inspected and approved as provided in
this section shall be required to have the same motor vehicle again inspected and approved for
the sole reason that such person wishes to obtain a set of any special personalized license
plates available pursuant to section 301.144 or a set of any license plates available pursuant to
section 301.142, prior to the expiration date of such motor vehicle's current registration.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390, violation of this section shall
be deemed an infraction.
307.380. 1. Every vehicle of the type required to be inspected upon having been
involved in an accident and when so directed by a police officer must be inspected and an
official certificate of inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device be obtained for
such vehicle before it is again operated on the highways of this state.
2. At the seller's expense every used motor vehicle of the type required to be
inspected by section 307.350 shall immediately prior to sale be fully inspected regardless of
any current certificate of inspection and approval, and an appropriate new certificate of
inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device shall be obtained no more than sixty
days prior to the date of sale, except that such inspection shall not be required for a
motor vehicle sold to a person who lives outside of this state and intends to register the
vehicle outside of this state or for a motor vehicle having less than thirty thousand miles
for the three-year period following the model year of manufacture when:
(1) Sold by a private seller; or

HB 2655 16
(2) Sold by a licensed new or used motor vehicle dealer, provided that such
dealer has sold at least two hundred motor vehicles in the previous calendar year.

The seller of a motor vehicle required to be inspected under this subsection shall present
the certificate of inspection and approval to the buyer at the point of sale and the buyer
shall be required to submit the certificate of inspection when applying for registration of
the vehicle.
[2.] 3. Nothing contained in the provisions of this section shall be construed to
prohibit a dealer or any other person from selling a vehicle without a certificate of inspection
and approval if the vehicle is sold for junk, salvage, or for rebuilding, or for vehicles sold at
public auction or from dealer to dealer. The purchaser of any vehicle which is purchased for
junk, salvage, or for rebuilding shall give to the seller an affidavit, on a form prescribed by the
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol, stating that the vehicle is being
purchased for one of the reasons stated herein. No vehicle of the type required to be inspected
by section 307.350 which is purchased as junk, salvage, or for rebuilding shall again be
registered in this state until the owner has submitted the vehicle for inspection and obtained
an official certificate of inspection and approval, sticker, seal or other device for such vehicle.
[3.] 4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390, violation of this section
shall be deemed an infraction.
✔